test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_moonnad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 


  Verb - moonnâđ: # MLO, checked
    moonnâđ+V+Inf: moonnâđ
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: moonâm
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: moonah
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mana
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: manneen
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: monâvettee
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: moonnâv
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: moonnâp
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: monâvetteđ
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: maneh
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: moonnim
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: moonnih
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: moonâi
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: moonáim
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: moonáid
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: moonáin
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: moonâim
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: moonâid
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: monnii
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: monâččim
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: monâččih
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: monâččij
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: monâččáim
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: monâččáid
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: monâččáin
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: monâččijm
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: monâččijd
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: monâččii
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: maaneem
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: maaneeh
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: moonâš
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: monâžeen
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: moonâšvettee
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: monâžává
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: monâžep
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: moonâšvetteđ
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: monâžeh
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: moonâ
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: manos
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: mannoon
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: mannee
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: mannoos
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: mannoop
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: moonnâđ
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: mannoos
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: moonâ
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: moonnâm
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: monâččii
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: moonii
    moonnâđ+V+PrsPrc: mannee
    moonnâđ+V+PrfPrc: moonnâm
    moonnâđ+V+Actio+Nom: moonnâm
    moonnâđ+V+Actio+Ess: monâmin
    moonnâđ+V+Actio+Loc: monâmist
    moonnâđ+V+Actio+Ill: monâmân
    moonnâđ+V+Actio+Com: monâdijn
    moonnâđ+V+VAbess: monâhánnáá


  Verb - cooijâđ: # MLO, checked
    cooijâđ+V+Inf: cooijâđ
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: coojâm
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: coojah
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: caja
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: caijeen
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: cojâvettee
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: cooijâv
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: cooijâp
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: cojâvetteđ
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: cajeh
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: cooijim
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: cooijih
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: coojâi
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: coojáim
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: coojáid
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: coojáin
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: coojâim
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: coojâid
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: coijii
    cooijâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: cojâččim
    cooijâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: cojâččih
    cooijâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: cojâččij
    cooijâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: cojâččáim
    cooijâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: cojâččáid
    cooijâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: cojâččáin
    cooijâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: cojâččijm
    cooijâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: cojâččijd
    cooijâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: cojâččii
    cooijâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: caajeem
    cooijâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: caajeeh
    cooijâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: coojâš
    cooijâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: cojâžeen
    cooijâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: coojâšvettee
    cooijâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: cojâžává
    cooijâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: cojâžep
    cooijâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: coojâšvetteđ
    cooijâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: cojâžeh
    cooijâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: coojâ
    cooijâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: cajos
    cooijâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: caijoon
    cooijâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: caijee
    cooijâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: caijoos
    cooijâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: caijoop
    cooijâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: cooijâđ
    cooijâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: caijoos
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: coojâ
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: cooijâm
    cooijâđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: cojâččii
    cooijâđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: coojii
    cooijâđ+V+PrsPrc: caijee
    cooijâđ+V+PrfPrc: cooijâm
    cooijâđ+V+Actio+Nom: cooijâm
    cooijâđ+V+Actio+Ess: cojâmin
    cooijâđ+V+Actio+Loc: cojâmist
    cooijâđ+V+Actio+Ill: cojâmân
    cooijâđ+V+Actio+Com: cojâdijn
    cooijâđ+V+VAbess: cojâhánnáá
